Massachusetts, session 194th, H160.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 94G of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the definition of “Mycotoxin” the following definitions:-
“Person or Entity Having Direct Control”, any person or entity having direct control over
the operations of a marijuana establishment, which satisfies one or more of the following criteria:
(a) An owner;
(b) A person or entity that possesses a voting interest of 10 percent or greater in a
marijuana establishment;
(c) A close associate;
(d) A person or entity that has the right to control or authority, through contract or
otherwise including, but not limited to: (1) To appoint more than 50% of the directors or their
of 3

equivalent; (2) To appoint or remove corporate-level officers or their equivalent; or (3) To earn
10 percent or more of the profits or collect more than 10 percent of the dividends.
(e) A court appointee or assignee pursuant to an agreement for a general assignment or
assignment for the benefit of creditors; or
(f) A third-party technology platform provider that possesses any financial interest in a
marijuana delivery licensee including, but not limited to, a delivery agreement or other
agreement for services.
“Person or Entity Having Indirect Control”, any person or entity having indirect control
over operations of a marijuana establishment. It specifically includes any person or entity having
direct control over an indirect holding or parent company of the applicant, and the chief
executive officer and executive director of those companies, or any person or entity in a position
indirectly to control the decision-making of a marijuana establishment.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 94G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the definition of “Production batch” the following definition:-
“Owner”, any person or entity owning directly or indirectly through parent or holding
company, or otherwise, 10 percent or more of the interest in a licensee,
SECTION 3. Section 16 of chapter 94G of the General Laws is hereby amended by
adding after the word “licenses” where last occurring:-
provided however that any licensee or any person or entity having direct or indirect
control may become a person or entity having direct or indirect control of up to 4 additional
marijuana retailer licenses or medical marijuana treatment center licenses if (i) such marijuana
of 3

retailer licenses are majority owned by a social equity business, economic empowerment
business, a Massachusetts Minority Business Enterprises (MBE), Women Business Enterprises
(WBE), or Veteran Business Enterprises (VBE) with valid certification from the Supplier
Diversity Office of the Massachusetts Operational Services Division as a Disadvantaged
Business Enterprise (DBE). and (ii) such person or entity owns directly or indirectly through a
parent or holding company, trust, or otherwise, no more than 35 percent of the interest of the
business.
of 3